Vermont, session 2025-2026, H81.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 20 V.S.A. § 4652 is amended to read:
§ 4652. AUTHORIZATION TO ENTER INTO AGREEMENTS
PURSUANT TO 8 U.S.C. § 1357(g) AND 19 U.S.C. § 1401(i)
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, only the Governor, in
consultation with the Vermont Attorney General upon approval from the
General Assembly as set forth in subsection (b) of this section, is authorized to
enter into, modify, or extend an agreement pursuant to 8 U.S.C. § 1357(g) or
19 U.S.C. § 1401(i).
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, a State, county, or
municipal law enforcement agency is authorized to enter into an agreement
pursuant to 8 U.S.C. § 1357(g) or 19 U.S.C. § 1401(i) when necessary to
address threats to the public safety or welfare of Vermont residents arising out
of a declaration of a State or national emergency.
(1) The Governor shall not enter into an agreement pursuant to 8 U.S.C.
§ 1357(g) or 19 U.S.C. § 1401(i) without prior approval from the General
Assembly.
(2) Not fewer than 60 days before the General Assembly may vote on a
proposed agreement pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection, the
Governor shall:
(A) provide the General Assembly with:
VT LEG #379794 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.81
2025 Page 3 of 4
(i) the full text of the proposed agreement; and
(ii) an analysis of the potential fiscal, social, and legal impacts of
the agreement; and
(B) hold one or more public hearings in order to inform and gather
input from Vermonters, including immigrant advocacy organizations, on the
proposed agreement.
(3) No agreement pursuant to 8 U.S.C. § 1357(g) or 19 U.S.C. § 1401(i)
shall be entered into if the General Assembly is not in session.
(4) No State, county, or municipal law enforcement agency or officer
shall engage in any duty or action pursuant to an 8 U.S.C. § 1357(g) or
19 U.S.C. § 1401(i) agreement unless the General Assembly approves of such
agreement as set forth in subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(c) On or before December 1 of each year, the Governor shall submit a
letter to the House Committee on Government Operations and Military Affairs
and the Senate Committee on Government Operations addressing the following
matters:
(1) providing details on any informal and formal discussions and
negotiations involving agreements pursuant to 8 U.S.C. § 1357(g) or 19 U.S.C.
§ 1401(i); and
VT LEG #379794 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.81
2025 Page 4 of 4
(2) confirming that no agreement pursuant to 8 U.S.C. § 1357(g) or
19 U.S.C. § 1401(i) has been entered into without approval from the General
Assembly.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379794 v.1